Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6004
Corrective order, defined.

Corrective order means an order issued by the director specifying corrective actions which the director has determined are required.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 16;

Laws 1999, LB 258, § 6.